Massachusetts, session 194th, S343.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the Legislature
shall establish a Special Commission to study the current status, structures, future vision and
needs of public education which will include but not be limited to all aspects of where we want
public education to be in five to ten years.
The Promise Commission shall consist of eleven (11) members appointed as follows: the
speaker of the house or a designee, the president of the senate or a designee, the commissioner of
elementary and secondary education, the commissioner of early education and care, the
commissioner of higher education, a member appointed by the Massachusetts association of
school superintendents, a member appointed by the Massachusetts association of school
committees, a member appointed by the Massachusetts affiliate of the American federation of
of 2

teachers, a member appointed by the Massachusetts teachers association, a member appointed by
the Massachusetts education equity partnership, and a Massachusetts based member appointed
by Latinos for education.
SECTION 2. The Commission shall conduct an ongoing study of all matters concerning
education in the 21st Century, including but not limited to: educator pipeline (including
recruitment, career development, and retention); educator diversity; improved reputation and
perception of the profession; curriculum and course of studies that meet the needs of students in
a global society regarding technology; flexible learning models beyond traditional “seat time;”
multilingualism as an asset and an aspiration; multiple modes of assessing learning beyond
MCAS; broader methods used for accountability that are ambitious, attainable, and
compassionate; and structures that take students from pre-K through college and provide the
wrap-around social/emotional and education coaching at each age. With these and other goals,
the Commission will dive deep into best practices found in other states and other countries.
SECTION 3. The Promise Commission shall develop a comprehensive report that re-
envisions the power and potential of the Massachusetts education system for all students who are
in our schools and who will be in our schools for years to come.
of 2